North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-294.
Solid waste management program.

The Department is authorized and directed to engage in research, conduct investigations and surveys, make inspections and establish a statewide solid waste management program. In establishing a program, the Department shall have authority to:

Develop a comprehensive program for implementation of safe and sanitary practices for management of solid waste;

Advise, consult, cooperate and contract with other State agencies, units of local government, the federal government, industries and individuals in the formulation and carrying out of a solid waste management program;

Develop and adopt rules to establish standards for qualification as a “recycling, reduction or resource recovering facility” or as “recycling, reduction or resource recovering equipment” for the purpose of special tax classifications or treatment, and
to certify as qualifying those applicants which meet the established standards. The standards shall be developed to qualify only those facilities and equipment exclusively used in the actual waste recycling, reduction or
resource recovering process and shall exclude any incidental or supportive facilities and equipment;

Develop a permit system governing the establishment and operation of solid waste management facilities. A landfill with a disposal area of 1/2 acre or less for the on-site disposal of land clearing and inert debris is exempt from the permit requirement
of this section and shall be governed by

G.S. 130A-301.1

. Demolition debris from the decommissioning of manufacturing buildings, including electric generating stations, that is disposed of on the same site as the decommissioned buildings, is exempt
from the permit requirement of this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section and shall be governed by

G.S. 130A-301.3

. The Department shall not approve an application for a new permit for a sanitary landfill, excluding demolition landfills as defined in the rules of the Commission, except as provided in subdivisions
(3) and (4) of subsection (b1) of this section. No permit shall be granted for a solid waste management facility having discharges that are point sources until the Department has referred the complete plans and
specifications to the Commission and has received advice in writing that the plans and specifications are approved in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 143-215.1

. In any case where the Department denies a permit for a solid waste management facility, it shall state in writing the reason for denial and shall also state its estimate of the changes in the
applicant’s proposed activities or plans that will be required for the applicant to obtain a permit.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-550, s. 1(a), effective August 1, 2007.

The Department shall deny an application for a permit for a solid waste management facility if the Department finds that:

Construction or operation of the proposed facility would be inconsistent with or violate rules adopted by the Commission.

Construction or operation of the proposed facility would result in a violation of water quality standards adopted by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 143-214.1

for waters, as defined in

G.S. 143-213

.

Construction or operation of the facility would result in significant damage to ecological systems, natural resources, cultural sites, recreation areas, or historic sites of more than local significance. These areas include, but are not limited to, national
or State parks or forests; wilderness areas; historic sites; recreation areas; segments of the natural and scenic rivers system; wildlife refuges, preserves, and management areas; areas that provide habitat
for threatened or endangered species; primary nursery areas and critical fisheries habitat designated by the Marine Fisheries Commission; and Outstanding Resource Waters designated by the Commission.

Construction or operation of the proposed facility would substantially limit or threaten access to or use of public trust waters or public lands.

The proposed facility would be located in a natural hazard area, including a floodplain, a landslide hazard area, or an area subject to storm surge or excessive seismic activity, such that the facility will present a risk to public health or safety.

There is a practical alternative that would accomplish the purposes of the proposed facility with less adverse impact on public resources, considering engineering requirements and economic costs.

The cumulative impacts of the proposed facility and other facilities in the area of the proposed facility would violate the criteria set forth in sub-sub-subdivisions 2. through 5. of this sub-subdivision.

Construction or operation of the proposed facility would be inconsistent with the State solid waste management policy and goals as set out in

G.S. 130A-309.04

and with the State solid waste management plan developed as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.07

.

The cumulative impact of the proposed facility, when considered in relation to other similar impacts of facilities located or proposed in the community, would have a disproportionate adverse impact on a minority or low-income community protected by Title
VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964. This subdivision shall apply only to the extent required by federal law.

Management of land clearing debris burned in accordance with 15A NCAC 02D.1903 shall not require a permit pursuant to this section.

(4a) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-550, s. 1(a), effective August 1, 2007.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 795, s. 3.

(5a) Designate a geographic area within which the collection, transportation, storage and disposal of all solid waste generated within said area shall be accomplished in accordance with a solid waste management plan. Such designation may be made only
after the Department has received a request from the unit or units of local government having jurisdiction within said geographic area that such designation be made and after receipt by the Department of a solid waste
management plan which shall include:

The existing and projected population for such area;

The quantities of solid waste generated and estimated to be generated in such area;

The availability of sanitary landfill sites and the environmental impact of continued landfill of solid waste on surface and subsurface waters;

The method of solid waste disposal to be utilized and the energy or material which shall be recovered from the waste; and

Such other data that the Department may reasonably require.

(5b) Subject to the limitations of

G.S. 130A-291

, authorize units of local government to require by ordinance, that all solid waste generated within the designated geographic area that is placed in the waste stream for disposal be collected, transported,
stored and disposed of at a permitted solid waste management facility or facilities serving such area. The provisions of such ordinance shall not be construed to prohibit the source separation of materials from solid
waste prior to collection of such solid waste for disposal, or prohibit collectors of solid waste from recycling materials or limit access to such materials as an incident to collection of such solid waste; provided
such prohibitions do not authorize the construction and operation of a resource recovery facility unless specifically permitted pursuant to an approved solid waste management plan. If a private solid waste landfill
shall be substantially affected by such ordinance then the unit of local government adopting the ordinance shall be required to give the operator of the affected landfill at least two years written notice prior to the
effective date of the proposed ordinance.

(5c) Except for the authority to designate a geographic area to be serviced by a solid waste management facility, delegate authority and responsibility to units of local government to perform all or a portion of a solid waste management program within
the jurisdictional area of the unit of local government; provided that no authority over or control of the operations or properties of one local government shall be delegated to any other local government.

(5d) Require that an annual report of the implementation of the solid waste management plan within the designated geographic area be filed with the Department.

Charge and collect fees from operators of hazardous waste disposal facilities. The fees shall be used to establish a fund sufficient for each individual facility to defray the anticipated costs to the State for monitoring and care of the facility after
the termination of the period during which the facility operator is required by applicable State and federal statutes, regulations or rules to remain responsible for post-closure monitoring and care. In establishing the
fees, consideration shall be given to the size of the facility, the nature of the hazardous waste and the projected life of the facility.

Establish and collect annual fees from generators and transporters of hazardous waste, and from storage, treatment, and disposal facilities regulated under this Article as provided in

G.S. 130A-294.1

.

(a1) A permit for a solid waste management facility may be transferred only with the approval of the Department.

(a2) Permits for sanitary landfills and transfer stations shall be issued for the life-of-site of the facility unless revoked. For purposes of this section, “life-of-site” means the period from the initial receipt of solid waste at the facility until
the facility reaches its final permitted elevations, which period shall not exceed 60 years. Permits issued pursuant to this subsection shall take into account the duration of any permits previously issued for the facility
and the remaining capacity at the facility.

(a3) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “New permit” means any of the following:

An application for a permit for a solid waste management facility that has not been previously permitted by the Department. The term includes one site suitability review, the initial permit to construct, and one permit to operate.

An application that proposes to expand the permitted activity of the waste management facility through an increase of ten percent (10%) or more in (i) the population of the geographic area to be served by the sanitary landfill; (ii) the quantity of solid
waste to be disposed of in the sanitary landfill; or (iii) the geographic area to be served by the sanitary landfill.

An application that includes a proposed expansion to the boundary of a waste disposal unit within a permitted solid waste management facility.

An application that includes a proposed change in the categories of solid waste to be disposed of in the sanitary landfill.

An application for a permit to be issued pursuant to G.S. 130A-294(a2), which is issued for a duration of less than a facility’s life-of-site based upon permits previously issued to a facility.

(2) “Permit amendment” means any of the following:

An application for the five-year renewal of a permit for a permitted solid waste management facility or for a permit review of a permitted solid waste management facility. This sub-subdivision shall not apply to sanitary landfills or transfer stations.

Any application that proposes a change in ownership or corporate structure of a permitted solid waste management facility.

(3) “Permit modification” means any of the following:

An application for any change to the plans approved in a permit for a solid waste management facility that does not constitute a “permit amendment” or a “new permit.”

An application for a five-year limited review of a 10-year permit, including review of the operations plan, closure plan, post-closure plan, financial assurance cost estimates, environmental monitoring plans, and any other applicable plans for the facility.

(a4) In order to preserve long-term disposal capacity, a life-of-site permit issued for a sanitary landfill shall survive the expiration of a local government approval or franchise, and the local government shall allow the sanitary landfill to continue
to operate until the term of the landfill’s life-of-site permit expires provided that the owner or operator has complied with the terms of the local government approval or franchise agreement,
and remains in compliance with those terms after expiration of the approval or agreement until the life-of-site permit has expired. In order to preserve any economic benefits included in the
franchise, the County may extend the franchise under the same terms and conditions for the term of the life-of-site permit. The extension of the franchise hereby shall not trigger the requirements
for a new permit, a major permit modification, or a substantial amendment to the permit. This subsection only applies to valid and operative franchise agreements in effect on October 1, 2015.

(2a) A local government may elect to award a preliminary franchise. If a local government elects to award a preliminary franchise, the preliminary franchise shall contain, at a minimum, all of the information described in sub-subdivisions a. through e.
of subdivision (2) of this subsection plus a general description of the proposed sanitary landfill, including the approximate number of acres required for the proposed sanitary landfill and its appurtenances and a description
of any other solid waste management activities that are to be conducted at the site.

(2b) A local government may elect to include as part of a franchise agreement a surcharge on waste disposed of in its jurisdiction by other local governments located within the State. Funds collected by a local government pursuant to such a surcharge
may be used to support any services supported by the local government’s general fund.

(3) Prior to the award of a franchise for the construction or operation of a sanitary landfill, the board of commissioners of the county or counties in which the sanitary landfill is proposed to be located or is located or, if the sanitary landfill is
proposed to be located or is located in a city, the governing board of the city shall conduct a public hearing. The board of commissioners of the county or counties in which the sanitary landfill is proposed to be located
or is located or, if the sanitary landfill is proposed to be located or is located in a city, the governing board of the city shall provide at least 30 days’ notice to the public of the public hearing. The notice shall
include a summary of all the information required to be included in the franchise, and shall specify the procedure to be followed at the public hearing. The applicant for the franchise shall provide a copy of the application
for the franchise that includes all of the information required to be included in the franchise, to the public library closest to the proposed sanitary landfill site to be made available for inspection and copying by
the public. The requirements of this subdivision shall not apply to franchises extended pursuant to subsection (a3) of this section.

(4) An applicant for a new permit for a sanitary landfill shall request each local government having jurisdiction over any part of the land on which the sanitary landfill and its appurtenances are located or to be located to issue a determination as to
whether the local government has in effect a franchise, zoning, subdivision, or land-use planning ordinance applicable to the sanitary landfill and whether the proposed sanitary landfill, or the existing sanitary landfill
as it would be operated under the permit, would be consistent with the applicable ordinances. The request to the local government shall be accompanied by a copy of the permit application and shall be delivered to the
clerk of the local government personally or by certified mail. In order to serve as a basis for a determination that an application for a new permit for a sanitary landfill is consistent with a zoning, subdivision,
or land-use planning ordinance, an ordinance or zoning classification applicable to the real property designated in the permit application shall have been in effect not less than 90 days prior to the date the request
for a determination of consistency is delivered to the clerk of the local government. The determination shall be verified or supported by affidavit signed by the chief administrative officer, the chief administrative
officer’s designee, clerk, or other official designated by the local government to make the determination and, if the local government states that the sanitary landfill as it would be operated under the new permit is
inconsistent with a franchise, zoning, subdivision, or land-use planning ordinance, shall include a copy of the ordinance and the specific reasons for the determination of inconsistency. A copy of the determination
shall be provided to the applicant when the determination is submitted to the Department. The Department shall not act upon an application for a permit under this section until it has received a determination from each
local government requested to make a determination by the applicant; provided that if a local government fails to submit a determination to the Department as provided by this subsection within 15 days after receipt
of the request, the Department shall proceed to consider the permit application without regard to a franchise, local zoning, subdivision, and land-use planning ordinances. Unless the local government makes a subsequent
determination of consistency with all ordinances cited in the determination or the sanitary landfill as it would be operated under the new permit is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be consistent with
the cited ordinances, the Department shall attach as a condition of the permit a requirement that the applicant, prior to construction or operation of the sanitary landfill under the permit, comply with all lawfully
adopted local ordinances cited in the determination that apply to the sanitary landfill. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the validity of any lawfully adopted franchise, local zoning, subdivision, or
land-use planning ordinance or to affect the responsibility of any person to comply with any lawfully adopted franchise, local zoning, subdivision, or land-use planning ordinance. This subsection shall not be construed
to limit any opportunity a local government may have to comment on a permit application under any other law or rule. This subsection shall not apply to any facility with respect to which local ordinances are subject
to review under either

G.S. 104E-6.2

or

G.S. 130A-293

.

(5) As used in this subdivision, “coal-fired generating unit” and “investor-owned public utility” have the same meaning as in

G.S. 143-215.1

07D(a). Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(4), (b1)(3), or (b1)(4) of this section, no franchise shall be required for a sanitary landfill used only to dispose of waste generated by a coal-fired generating
unit that is owned or operated by an investor-owned utility subject to the requirements of

G.S. 143-215.107

D.

(b2) The Department shall require an applicant for a permit or a permit holder under this Article to satisfy the Department that the applicant or permit holder, and any parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant, permit holder, or parent,
including any joint venturer with a direct or indirect interest in the applicant, permit holder, or parent:

The Commission shall adopt and the Department shall enforce rules to implement a comprehensive statewide solid waste management program. The rules shall be consistent with applicable State and federal law; and shall be designed to protect the public health,
safety, and welfare; preserve the environment; and provide for the greatest possible conservation of cultural and natural resources. Rules for the establishment, location, operation, maintenance, use, discontinuance, recordation,
post-closure care of solid waste management facilities also shall be based upon recognized public health practices and procedures, including applicable epidemiological research and studies; hydrogeological research and studies;
sanitary engineering research and studies; and current technological development in equipment and methods. The rules shall not apply to the management of solid waste that is generated by an individual or individual family or household
unit on the individual’s property and is disposed of on the individual’s property.

(b1) (1) For purposes of this subsection and subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section, a “substantial amendment” means either:

An increase of ten percent (10%) or more in:

The population of the geographic area to be served by the sanitary landfill;

The quantity of solid waste to be disposed of in the sanitary landfill; or

The geographic area to be served by the sanitary landfill.

A change in the categories of solid waste to be disposed of in the sanitary landfill or any other change to the application for a permit or to the permit for a sanitary landfill that the Commission or the Department determines to be substantial.

(2) A person who intends to apply for a new permit for a sanitary landfill shall obtain, prior to applying for a permit, a franchise for the operation of the sanitary landfill from each local government having jurisdiction over any part of the land on
which the sanitary landfill and its appurtenances are located or to be located. A local government may adopt a franchise ordinance under

G.S. 153A-136

or

G.S. 160A-319

. A franchise granted for a sanitary landfill shall (i) be granted for the life-of-site of the landfill, but for a period not to exceed 60 years, and (ii) include all of the following:

A statement of the population to be served, including a description of the geographic area.

A description of the volume and characteristics of the waste stream.

A projection of the useful life of the sanitary landfill.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-409, s. 8, effective August 23, 2013.

The procedures to be followed for governmental oversight and regulation of the fees and rates to be charged by facilities subject to the franchise for waste generated in the jurisdiction of the franchising entity.

A facility plan for the sanitary landfill that shall include the boundaries of the proposed facility, proposed development of the facility site, the boundaries of all waste disposal units, final elevations and capacity of all waste disposal units, the
amount of waste to be received per day in tons, the total waste disposal capacity of the sanitary landfill in tons, a description of environmental controls, and a description of any other waste management activities
to be conducted at the facility. In addition, the facility plan shall show the proposed location of soil borrow areas, leachate facilities, and all other facilities and infrastructure, including ingress and egress
to the facility.

Is financially qualified to carry out the activity for which the permit is required. An applicant for a permit and permit holders for solid waste management facilities that are not hazardous waste facilities shall establish financial responsibility as
required by

G.S. 130A-295.2

. An applicant for a permit and permit holders for hazardous waste facilities shall establish financial responsibility as required by

G.S. 130A-295.04

.

Has substantially complied with the requirements applicable to any activity in which the applicant or permit holder, or a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the applicant, permit holder, or parent, or a joint venturer with a direct or indirect
interest in the applicant has previously engaged and has been in substantial compliance with federal and state laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment as provided in

G.S. 130A-295.3

.

(b3) An applicant for a permit or a permit holder under this Article shall satisfy the Department that the applicant has met the requirements of subsection (b2) of this section before the Department is required to otherwise review the application.

The Commission shall adopt and the Department shall enforce rules governing the management of hazardous waste. These rules shall establish a complete and integrated regulatory scheme in the area of hazardous waste management, implement this Part, and
shall:

Establish criteria for hazardous waste, identify the characteristics of hazardous waste, and list particular hazardous waste.

(1a) Establish criteria for hazardous constituents, identify the characteristics of hazardous constituents, and list particular hazardous constituents.

Require record keeping and reporting by generators and transporters of hazardous waste and owners and operators of hazardous waste facilities.

Require proper labeling of hazardous waste containers.

Require use of appropriate containers for hazardous waste.

Require maintenance of a manifest system to assure that all hazardous waste is designated for treatment, storage or disposal at a hazardous waste facility to which a permit has been issued.

Require proper transportation of hazardous waste.

Develop treatment storage and disposal standards of performance and techniques to be used by hazardous waste facilities.

Develop standards regarding location, design, ownership and construction of hazardous waste facilities; provided, however, that no hazardous waste disposal facility or polychlorinated biphenyl disposal facility shall be located within 25 miles of any
other hazardous waste disposal facility or polychlorinated biphenyl disposal facility.

Require plans to minimize unanticipated damage from treatment, storage or disposal of hazardous waste; and a plan or plans providing for the establishment and/or operation of one or more hazardous waste facilities in the absence of adequate approved hazardous
waste facilities established or operated by any person within the State.

Require proper maintenance and operation of hazardous waste facilities, including requirements for ownership by any person or the State, require demonstration of financial responsibility in accordance with this section and

G.S. 130A-295.04

, provide for training of personnel, and provide for continuity of operation and procedures for establishing and maintaining hazardous waste facilities.

Require owners or operators of hazardous waste facilities to monitor the facilities.

Authorize or require inspection or copying of records required to be kept by owners or operators.

Provide for collection and analysis of hazardous waste samples and samples of hazardous waste containers and labels from generators and transporters and from owners and operators of hazardous waste facilities.

Develop a permit system governing the establishment and operation of hazardous waste facilities.

Develop additional requirements as necessary for the effective management of hazardous waste.

Require the operator of the hazardous waste disposal facility to maintain adequate insurance to cover foreseeable claims arising from the operation of the facility. The Department shall determine what constitutes an adequate amount of insurance.

Require the bottom of a hazardous waste disposal facility to be at least 10 feet above the seasonal high water table and more when necessary to protect the public health and the environment.

Require the operator of a hazardous waste disposal facility to make monthly reports to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the facility is located on the kinds and amounts of hazardous wastes in the facility.

The Commission is authorized to adopt and the Department is authorized to enforce rules where appropriate for public participation in the consideration, development, revision, implementation and enforcement of any permit rule, guideline, information or
program under this Article.

Rules adopted under this section may incorporate standards and restrictions which exceed and are more comprehensive than comparable federal regulations.

Within 10 days of receiving an application for a permit or for an amendment to an existing permit for a hazardous waste facility, the Department shall notify the clerk of the board of commissioners of the county or counties in which the facility is proposed
to be located or is located and, if the facility is proposed to be located or is located within a city, the clerk of the governing board of the city, that the application has been filed, and shall file a copy of the application
with the clerk. Prior to the issuance of a permit or an amendment of an existing permit the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall conduct a public hearing in the county, or in one of the counties in which the hazardous waste
facility is proposed to be located or is located. The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall give notice of the hearing, and the public hearing shall be in accordance with applicable federal regulations adopted pursuant to
RCRA and with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Where the provisions of the federal regulations and Chapter 150B of the General Statutes are inconsistent, the federal regulations shall apply.

The Commission shall develop and adopt standards for permitting of hazardous waste facilities. Such standards shall be developed with, and provide for, public participation; shall be incorporated into rules; shall be consistent with all applicable federal
and State law, including statutes, regulations and rules; shall be developed and revised in light of the best available scientific data; and shall be based on consideration of at least the following factors:

Hydrological and geological factors, including flood plains, depth to water table, groundwater travel time, soil pH, soil cation exchange capacity, soil composition and permeability, cavernous bedrock, seismic activity, slope, mines, and climate;

Environmental and public health factors, including air quality, quality of surface and groundwater, and proximity to public water supply watersheds;

Natural and cultural resources, including wetlands, gamelands, endangered species habitats, proximity to parks, forests, wilderness areas, nature preserves, and historic sites;

Local land uses;

Transportation factors, including proximity to waste generators, route safety, and method of transportation;

Aesthetic factors, including the visibility, appearance, and noise level of the facility;

Availability and reliability of public utilities; and

Availability of emergency response personnel and equipment.

Rules adopted by the Commission shall be subject to the following requirements:

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 168, s. 20.

Hazardous waste shall be treated prior to disposal in North Carolina. The Commission shall determine the extent of waste treatment required before hazardous waste can be disposed of in a hazardous waste disposal facility.

Any hazardous waste disposal facility hereafter constructed in this State shall meet, at the minimum, the standards of construction imposed by federal regulations adopted under the RCRA at the time the permit is issued.

No hazardous waste disposal facility or polychlorinated biphenyl disposal facility shall be located within 25 miles of any other hazardous waste disposal facility or polychlorinated biphenyl disposal facility.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 23, effective November 29, 2001.

The following shall not be disposed of in a hazardous waste disposal facility: ignitables as defined in the RCRA, polyhalogenated biphenyls of 50 ppm or greater concentration, and free liquids whether or not containerized.

Facilities for disposal or long-term storage of hazardous waste shall have at a minimum the following: a leachate collection and removal system above an artificial impervious liner of at least 30 mils in thickness, a minimum of five feet of clay or clay-like
liner with a maximum permeability of 1.0 x 10-7 centimeters per second (cm/sec) below said artificial liner, and a leachate detection system immediately below the clay or clay-like liner.

Hazardous waste shall not be stored at a hazardous waste treatment facility for over 90 days prior to treatment or disposal.

The Commission shall consider any hazardous waste treatment process proposed to it, if the process lessens treatment cost or improves treatment over then current methods or standards required by the Commission.

Prevention, reduction, recycling, and detoxification of hazardous wastes should be encouraged and promoted. Hazardous waste disposal facilities and polychlorinated biphenyl disposal facilities shall be detoxified as soon as technology which is economically
feasible is available and sufficient money is available without additional appropriation.

The Department shall include in the status of solid waste management report required to be submitted pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a report on the implementation and cost of the hazardous waste management program. The report shall include an evaluation
of how well the State and private parties are managing and cleaning up hazardous waste. The report shall also include recommendations to the Governor, State agencies, and the General Assembly on ways to: improve waste management;
reduce the amount of waste generated; maximize resource recovery, reuse, and conservation; and minimize the amount of hazardous waste which must be disposed of. The report shall include beginning and ending balances in the Hazardous
Waste Management Account for the reporting period, total fees collected pursuant to

G.S. 130A-294.1

, anticipated revenue from all sources, total expenditures by activities and categories for the hazardous waste management program, any recommended adjustments in annual and tonnage fees which may be necessary to
assure the continued availability of funds sufficient to pay the State’s share of the cost of the hazardous waste management program, and any other information requested by the General Assembly. In recommending adjustments in annual
and tonnage fees, the Department may propose fees for hazardous waste generators, and for hazardous waste treatment facilities that treat waste generated on site, which are designed to encourage reductions in the volume or quantity
and toxicity of hazardous waste. The report shall also include a description of activities undertaken to implement the resident inspectors program established under

G.S. 130A-295.02

. In addition, the report shall include an annual update on the mercury switch removal program that shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

A detailed description and documentation of the capture rate achieved.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(b), effective December 31, 2017.

In the event that a capture rate of at least ninety percent (90%) is not achieved, a description of additional or alternative actions that may be implemented to improve the mercury minimization plan and its implementation.

The number of mercury switches collected, the number of end-of-life vehicles containing mercury switches, the number of end-of-life vehicles processed for recycling, and a description of how the mercury switches were managed.

A statement that details the costs required to implement the mercury minimization plan.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-107, s. 1.1(e), effective October 1, 2007.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-209, s. 2(a), effective October 4, 2017.

Disposal of solid waste in or upon water in a manner that results in solid waste entering waters or lands of the State is unlawful. Nothing herein shall be interpreted to affect disposal of solid waste in a permitted landfill.

Demolition debris consisting of used asphalt or used asphalt mixed with dirt, sand, gravel, rock, concrete, or similar nonhazardous material may be used as fill and need not be disposed of in a permitted landfill or solid waste disposal facility. Such
demolition debris may not be placed in the waters of the State or at or below the seasonal high water table.

The Department shall encourage research and development and disseminate information on state-of-the-art means of handling and disposing of hazardous waste. The Department may establish a waste information exchange for the State.

The Department shall promote public education and public involvement in the decision-making process for the siting and permitting of proposed hazardous waste facilities. The Department shall assist localities in which facilities are proposed in collecting
and receiving information relating to the suitability of the proposed site. At the request of a local government in which facilities are proposed, the Department shall direct the appropriate agencies of State government to develop
such relevant data as that locality shall reasonably request.

The Department shall each year recommend to the Governor a recipient for a “Governor’s Award of Excellence” which the Governor shall award for outstanding achievement by an industry or company in the area of waste management.

The Secretary shall, at the request of the Governor and under the Governor’s direction, assist with the negotiation of interstate agreements for the management of hazardous waste.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-3, s. 12.3(b), effective July 1, 2015.

The Department is authorized to enter upon any lands and structures upon lands to make surveys, borings, soundings, and examinations as may be necessary to determine the suitability of a site for a hazardous waste facility or hazardous waste disposal
facility. The Department shall give 30 days notice of the intended entry authorized by this section in the manner prescribed for service of process by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4. Entry under this section shall not be deemed a trespass or taking; provided, however, that the Department shall make reimbursement for any damage to land or structures caused by these activities.

Construction and demolition debris diverted from the waste stream or collected as source separated material is subject to a solid waste permit for transfer, treatment, and processing in a permitted solid waste management facility. The Department may adopt
rules to implement this subsection.

Garbage diverted from the waste stream or collected as source separated material is subject to a solid waste permit for transfer, treatment, and processing in a permitted solid waste management facility. The Department may adopt rules to implement this
subsection.

History.
1969, c. 899; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 311, s. 4; c. 764, s. 1; 1977, c. 123; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1979, c. 464, s. 2; c. 694, s. 2; 1981, c. 704, s. 6; 1983, c. 795, ss. 3, 8.1; c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess.,
1984), c. 973, ss. 6, 7; c. 1034, s. 73; 1985, c. 582; c. 738, ss. 2, 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1027, s. 31; 1987, c. 597; c. 761; c. 773, s. 1; c. 827, ss. 1, 250; c. 848; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 6; 1989, c. 168,
ss. 15-22; c. 317; c. 727, s. 218(86); c. 742, s. 6; 1991, c. 537, s. 1; 1993, c. 86, s. 1; c. 273, s. 1; c. 365, s. 1; c. 473, ss. 1, 2; c. 501, s. 14; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 580, s. 1; c. 722, ss. 1, 2; 1995, c. 502, s. 1; c.
509, s. 70; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, ss. 6, 7; 1997-27, s. 2; 2001-357, s. 2; 2001-474, ss. 22, 23, 24, 25.; 2002-148, s. 4; 2003-37, s. 1; 2006-256, ss. 1, 2, 3; 2007-107, ss. 1.1(b), 1.1(d), 1.1(e), 2.1(a); 2007-495, s. 14;
2007-550, s. 1(a); 2012-200, s. 21(a), (b); 2013-55, s. 1; 2013-408, s. 1; 2013-409, s. 8; 2013-413, ss. 28(e), 59(a), 59.4(e); 2014-3, s. 12.3(b); 2014-115, s. 17; 2014-122, s. 11(c); 2015-1, s. 2(c); 2015-241, s. 14.20(a); 2015-286,
s. 4.9(a), (d); 2017-10 s. 3.1(a), (d); 2017-10 ss. 3.1(a), (d), 3.2(a), (b), (e), 4.14(f); 2017-209, ss. 2(a), 16, 17(b); 2017-211, s. 16(a), (b), (c), (d); 2018-114, s. 21(a); 2020-74, s. 11(c); 2020-78, s. 7.2(c).

Subsection (i) Set Out Twice.
